District of Columbia statutes.
32-131.04

Certification.

(a)

(1)

An employer may require that paid leave under § 32-131.02(b) for 3 or more consecutive days be supported by reasonable certification.

(2)

Reasonable certification may include:

(A)

A signed document from a health care provider, as defined in § 32-501(5), affirming the illness of the employee;

(B)

A police report indicating that the employee was a victim of stalking, domestic violence, or sexual abuse;

(C)

A court order; or

(D)

A signed statement from a victim and witness advocate, or domestic violence counselor, as defined in § 14-310(a)(2), affirming that the employee is involved in legal action related to stalking, domestic violence, or sexual abuse.

(3)

If certification is required by an employer, the employee shall provide a copy of the certification to the employer upon the employee’s return to work.

(b)

(1)

This chapter shall not require a health care professional to disclose information in violation of section 1177 of the Social Security Act, approved August 21, 1996 (110 Stat. 2029; 42 U.S.C. § 1320d-6), or the regulations promulgated pursuant to section 264(c) of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, approved August 21, 1996 (110 Stat. 2033; 42 U.S.C. § 1320d-2, note).

(2)

All information provided to the employer under § 32-131.02 shall not be disclosed by the employer, except to the extent that the disclosure is:

(A)

Requested or consented to by the employee;

(B)

Ordered by a court or administrative agency; or

(C)

Otherwise required by applicable federal or local law.

History

May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-152, § 5, 55 DCR 3452